Tennessee, session 114, SB2626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-18-101(1), is amended by deleting
the subdivision and substituting:
(1) Those who have been convicted of offering or giving a bribe, or any other
offense declared infamous under § 40-20-112, unless restored to citizenship under title
40, chapter 29; provided, that a person is forever disqualified from holding public office if:
(A) The person has been convicted of an infamous crime if the offense
was committed in the person's official capacity or involved the duties of the
person's office; or
(B) The person's restoration of citizenship was pursuant to a presidential
pardon;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-35-124(a), is amended by deleting
from subdivision (1) the language "arising out of the employee's or official's employment or
official capacity, constituting malfeasance in office"; by deleting from subdivision (2) the
language "arising out of that person's employment or official capacity, constituting malfeasance
in office"; and by deleting from subdivision (3) the language "arising out of that person's official
capacity, constituting malfeasance in office".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-35-203(c), is amended by deleting
the language "arising out of the employee's or official's employment or official capacity
constituting malfeasance in office".
SB2626
011147
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-201(b)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting the language "arising out of the employee's or official's employment or official capacity
constituting malfeasance in office".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-918(a), is amended by deleting
the language "arising out of that employee's or official's employment or official capacity
constituting malfeasance in office".
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to felony convictions on or after July 1, 2026.
- 2 - 011147